test/src/morphology/adj-roots_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from  with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  A: #
    aakkostettu+A+Sg+Nom: aakkostettu # 
    aakkostettu+A+Sg+Par: aakkostettuja # 
    aakkostettu+A+Pl+Nom: aakkostetut # 
    aakkostettu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aakkostetumpi # 
    aakkostettu+A+Comp+Sg+Ess: aakkostetumpina # 
    aakkostettu+A+Sup+Sg+Nom: aakkostetuin # 
    aakkostettu+A+Sup+Pl+Nom: aakkostetuimmat # 
